Maryland, session 2025, HB0863.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
4–142.
(a) It is the policy of the State that each local school system operate its school
library media program consistent with the following standards:
(1) The materials, services, [and] resources, AND PROGRAMMING
provided in a school library media program are provided for the interest, information, and
instructional support of students and school personnel of the schools the program serves;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0863*

HOUSE BILL 863
(2) Materials may not be excluded from a school library media program
solely because of the origin, background, or views of the individual who created the
material; and
(3) Materials may not be excluded or removed from the catalogue of a
school library media program because of partisan, ideological, or religious disapproval.
23–102.1.
(b) It is the policy of the State that each library shall operate in a manner
consistent with the following standards:
(1) Library materials, services, [and] resources, AND PROGRAMS exist
and should be provided for the interest, information, and enlightenment of all persons the
library serves;
(2) A library should not exclude material from its catalogue because of the
origin, background, or views of a person who created the material; and
(3) A library should not prohibit or remove material from its catalogue
because of partisan, ideological, or religious disapproval.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.